District of Columbia statutes.
3-1202.08

Board of Pharmacy and Advisory Committee on Clinical Laboratory Practitioners.

(a)

There is established a Board of Pharmacy to consist of 7 members appointed by the Mayor.

(b)

(1)

The Board shall regulate the practice of pharmacy, the practice of pharmaceutical detailing, the practice of pharmacy technicians, and the practice of clinical laboratory practitioners with guidelines approved by the Advisory Committee on Clinical Laboratory Practitioners.

(1A)

The Board shall administer the examination required for cytotechnologists, histologic technicians, histotechnologists, medical laboratory technicians, and medical technologists.

(2)

The Board is authorized to:

(A)

Establish a code of ethics for the practice of pharmaceutical detailing; and

(B)

Collect information from licensed pharmaceutical detailers relating to their communications with licensed health professionals, or with employees or representatives of licensed health professionals, located in the District.

(c)

Of the members of the Board, 5 shall be pharmacists licensed in the District and 2 shall be consumer members.

(d)

Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, members of the Board shall be appointed for terms of 3 years.

(e)

Of the members initially appointed under this section, 2 shall be appointed for a term of 1 year, 2 shall be appointed for a term of 2 years, and 3 shall be appointed for a term of 3 years.

(f)

An individual licensed to practice pharmacy pursuant to this chapter may administer immunizations and vaccinations only if certified to do so by the Board and only pursuant to a written protocol and valid prescription or standing order of a physician.

(g)

The Board and the Board of Medicine shall jointly develop and promulgate regulations to implement and regulate the administration of vaccinations and immunizations by pharmacists and to authorize pharmacists certified to administer vaccinations and immunizations to administer emergency anaphylactic reaction treatment pursuant to an approved physician-pharmacist protocol.

(h)

(1)

A licensed pharmacist may initiate, modify, or discontinue a drug therapy regimen pursuant to a collaborative practice agreement with a licensed physician, or, pursuant to § 3-1204.12, other health practitioner.

(2)

The Board and the Board of Medicine shall jointly develop and issue regulations governing the implementation and use of collaborative practice agreements between a licensed pharmacist and a licensed physician. At minimum, the regulations shall:

(A)

Require that all collaborative practice agreements include:

(i)

Specification of the drug therapy to be provided and any tests that may be necessarily incident to its provision;

(ii)

The conditions for initiating, modifying, or discontinuing a drug therapy; and

(iii)

Directions concerning the monitoring of a drug therapy, including the conditions that would warrant a modification to the dose, dosage regime, or dosage form of the drug therapy; and

(B)

Establish policies and procedures for approving, disapproving, and revoking collaborative practice agreements.

(i)

There is established an Advisory Committee on Clinical Laboratory Practitioners, which shall consist of 5 members appointed by the Mayor.

(j)

The Advisory Committee on Clinical Laboratory Practitioners shall develop and submit to the Board guidelines for the licensure of cytotechnologists, histologic technicians, histotechnologists, medical laboratory technicians, medical technologists, and the registration of phlebotomists.

(k)

Of the members of the Advisory Committee on Clinical Laboratory Practitioners, one shall be a pathologist certified by the American Board of Pathology or the American Board of Osteopathic Pathology; one shall be a medical technologist and supervisor; one shall be a medical technologist who is not a supervisor; one shall be a medical laboratory technician; and one shall be a consumer member with no direct affiliation with clinical laboratory practitioners or another health profession. Of the members of the Advisory Committee on Clinical Laboratory Practitioners, one shall be a pathologist certified by the American Board of Pathology or the American Board of Osteopathic Pathology; one shall be a medical technologist and supervisor; one shall be a medical technologist who is not a supervisor; one shall be a medical laboratory technician; and one shall be a consumer member with no direct affiliation with clinical laboratory practitioners or another health profession.

(l)

The qualifications for the professional members of the Advisory Committee on Clinical Laboratory Practitioners shall be as follows:

(1)

The pathologist, for at least 3 years preceding appointment, shall have been actively engaged as a pathologist in rendering professional services in pathology or in the education and training of medical personnel in pathology.

(2)

The medical technologist, for at least 3 years preceding the appointment, shall have been actively engaged as a medical technologist in rendering professional services in medical technology or in the education and training of medical technologists.

(3)

The medical laboratory technician, for at least 3 years preceding the appointment, shall have been actively engaged as a medical laboratory technician in rendering professional services as a medical technician.

(m)

The initial appointees of the Advisory Committee on Clinical Laboratory Practitioners, with the exception of the pathologist and the consumer representative, shall become licensed in the profession in which they have been practicing immediately upon their appointment and qualification as members of the Advisory Committee on Clinical Laboratory Practitioners.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 208, 33 DCR 729
Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-131, § 102(c), 55 DCR 1659
Mar. 20, 2009, D.C. Law 17-306, § 2(b), 56 DCR 23
Oct. 22, 2012, D.C. Law 19-185, § 2(b), 59 DCR 9454
May 1, 2013, D.C. Law 19-303, § 2(b), 60 DCR 2711
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-272, § 2(c), 62 DCR 1911
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of Pharmacy Practice Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-29, March 16, 2009, 56 DCR 2323).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of Pharmacy Practice Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-596, December 8, 2008, 55 DCR 12816).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-272 rewrote the section heading; rewrote (b)(1); added (b)(1A); and added (i), (j), (k), (l), and (m).
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-303 added “and the practice of pharmacy technicians” in (b)(1); and made a related change.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-185 added (h).
D.C. Law 17-306 added subsecs. (f) and (g).
D.C. Law 17-131 rewrote subsec. (b), which had read as follows: “(b) The Board shall regulate the practice of pharmacy.”
1981 Ed., § 2-3302.8.
This section is referenced in § 1-523.01 and § 3-1207.42.